Utah statutes.
19-6-208.   Facilities subject to Industrial Facilities and Development Act.
The financing, acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, improving,
maintaining, equipping, or finishing of a hazardous waste treatment, disposal,
or storage facility is deemed, where applicable, to be a "project," subject to
the Utah Industrial Facilities and Development Act.
